en: Mille-feuille pastry
fr: Millefeuilles, millefeuille, Mille-feuille
hr: Mille-feuille pecivo
nl: Tompouces

fr: Religieuses, religieuse
nl: Moorkoppen

en: Baklava
xx: Baklava
bg: Баклава
fr: Baklava, Baklawa
ja: バクラヴァ

en: Gazelle horn
fr: Corne de gazelle

en: Makroudh
de: Makroud
fr: Makrout, Makroud
hr: Makroudh

en: Kadaif, tel kadayif, kadayif
fr: Kadayif, tel kadayif, Kadaifs

en: Kadaif pastas, kadayif pastas, kataifi pasta
fr: Pâtes à Kadaïf, pâtes à kadayif, pâtes à kataifi

en: Frozen Kadaif pastas, frozen kadayif pastas, frozen kataifi pasta
fr: Pâtes à Kadaïf surgelées, pâtes à kadayif surgelées, pâtes à kataifi surgelées

en: Pickles
ca: Conserves
da: Syltet mad
de: Eingelegte Lebensmittel
es: Encurtidos
fi: säilykkeet
fr: Pickles
he: חמוצים
hr: Pickles
hu: Savanyúságok
it: Sottaceti, Sottoaceti, Sott'aceti, Alimenti sottoaceto, Alimenti sottaceto, Alimenti sott'aceto
ja: ピクルス
nl: Tafelzuren
pl: Produkty marynowane
pt: Picles
ru: Солёные или маринованные огурцы
sv: Inlagd mat, Pickels, Pickles
th: ผักดอง
tr: Turşu
zh: 腌渍食品

en: Pickles - Relishes - Chutneys - Olives variety packs
de: Eingelegtes Gemüse / Relishes / Chutneys / Oliven - Mischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de pepinillos y aceitunas
fr: Assortiments de conserves au vinaigre et olives
hr: Kiseli krastavci - slastice - chutney - pakiranja maslina
it: Confezioni miste di sottaceti e olive
nl: Tafelzurenassortimenten
pt: Packs variados de pickles - chutneys y azeitonas

en: Pies
bg: Пайове
ca: Pastissos
es: Tartas
fi: piirakat
fr: Tartes
hr: Pite, pita
it: Torte dolci e salate
ja: パイ
nl: Taarten
pt: Tortas
zh: 馅饼

en: Sweet pies, sweet pie
bg: Сладки пайове
ca: Pastissos dolços
de: Süße Kuchen
fi: makeat piirakat
fr: Tartes sucrées, tarte sucrée
hr: Slatke pite
it: Torte dolci
nl: Zoeten taarten
zh: 甜派

en: Crostata
es: Crostata
fr: Crostata
hr: Krostata
it: Crostata

en: Pumpkin pies
de: Kürbiskuchen
fr: Tartes à la citrouille
hr: Pite od bundeve
ja: かぼちゃパイ, パンプキンパイ
nl: Pompoentaarten

en: Cream Pies, Cream tarts
fr: Tartes à la crème, Tarte à la crème
hr: Krem pite
nl: Roomtaarten

en: Coconut pies, Coconut tarts
fr: Tartes à la noix de coco, Tarte à la noix de coco
hr: Pite od kokosa
nl: Kokostaarten

en: Pecan pies
de: Pekannusskuchen
es: Tartas de nuez pecana
fi: pekaanipiiraat
fr: Tartes aux noix de pécan, Tartes à la noix de pécan, Tarte aux noix de pécan, Tarte à la noix de pécan
hr: Pite od oraha oraha
it: Torte alle noci pecan
nl: Pecantaarten
pt: Tortas de nozes-pecã
zh: 山核桃派

en: Nuts pies
de: Nusskuchen
fr: Tartes aux noix
hr: Pite s orasima
nl: Notentaart

en: Turron pies
es: Tartas de turrón

en: Chocolate pies, Chocolate tarts
de: Schokoladentorten, Schokotorten
fr: Tartes au chocolat, Tarte au chocolat
hr: Čokoladne pite
nl: Chocoladetaarten